GRAMMARS/GERMAN/FST1/src/norm-umlaut.xfst
# ============================================================================
# TYPE:		(x)fst script
# CONTENT:	normalizer for umlaut characters
#
# LANGUAGE:	GERMAN
# ENCODING:	UTF-8
#
# AUTHOR:	A. Schiller
#
# CREATED:	24-Apr-2002
# UPDATED:	02-Aug-2006	(converted to UTF-8)
#
# ============================================================================
# USAGE: 	xfst -l [ThisFile]
# ============================================================================

echo >>> map umlaut characters and ß
# ä ö ü Ä Ö Ü ß

regex   
[
 ä (<->) a e ,	Ä (<->) A [e|E],
 ö (<->) o e,	Ö (<->) O [e|E],
 ü (<->) u e, 	Ü (<->) U [e|E],
 ß (<->) s s
];
